algorithms/english_porter.sbl
/*
 * English language stemmer - Porter
 *
 * Source obtained from https://snowballstem.org/algorithms/porter/stemmer.html,
 * under the BSD public license, created by Martin Porter in 1980.
 */

integers ( p1 p2 )
booleans ( Y_found )

routines (
   shortv
   R1 R2
   Step_1a Step_1b Step_1c Step_2 Step_3 Step_4 Step_5a Step_5b
)

externals ( stem )

groupings ( v v_WXY )

define v        'aeiouy'
define v_WXY    v + 'wxY'

backwardmode (

    define shortv as ( non-v_WXY v non-v )

    define R1 as $p1 <= cursor
    define R2 as $p2 <= cursor

    define Step_1a as (
        [substring] among (
            'sses' (<-'ss')
            'ies'  (<-'i')
            'ss'   ()
            's'    (delete)
        )
    )

    define Step_1b as (
        [substring] among (
            'eed'  (R1 <-'ee')
            'ed'
            'ing' (
                test gopast v  delete
                test substring among(
                    'at' 'bl' 'iz'
                         (<+ 'e')
                    'bb' 'dd' 'ff' 'gg' 'mm' 'nn' 'pp' 'rr' 'tt'
                    // ignoring double c, h, j, k, q, v, w, and x
                         ([next]  delete)
                    ''   (atmark p1  test shortv  <+ 'e')
                )
            )
        )
    )

    define Step_1c as (
        ['y' or 'Y']
        gopast v
        <-'i'
    )

    define Step_2 as (
        [substring] R1 among (
            'tional'  (<-'tion')
            'enci'    (<-'ence')
            'anci'    (<-'ance')
            'abli'    (<-'able')
            'entli'   (<-'ent')
            'eli'     (<-'e')
            'izer' 'ization'
                      (<-'ize')
            'ational' 'ation' 'ator'
                      (<-'ate')
            'alli'    (<-'al')
            'alism' 'aliti'
                      (<-'al')
            'fulness' (<-'ful')
            'ousli' 'ousness'
                      (<-'ous')
            'iveness' 'iviti'
                      (<-'ive')
            'biliti'  (<-'ble')
        )
    )

    define Step_3 as (
        [substring] R1 among (
            'alize'   (<-'al')
            'icate' 'iciti' 'ical'
                      (<-'ic')
            'ative' 'ful' 'ness'
                      (delete)
        )
    )

    define Step_4 as (
        [substring] R2 among (
            'al' 'ance' 'ence' 'er' 'ic' 'able' 'ible' 'ant' 'ement'
            'ment' 'ent' 'ou' 'ism' 'ate' 'iti' 'ous' 'ive' 'ize'
                      (delete)
            'ion'     ('s' or 't' delete)
        )
    )

    define Step_5a as (
        ['e']
        R2 or (R1 not shortv)
        delete
    )

    define Step_5b as (
        ['l']
        R2 'l'
        delete
    )
)

define stem as (

    unset Y_found
    do ( ['y'] <-'Y' set Y_found)
    do repeat(goto (v ['y']) <-'Y' set Y_found)

    $p1 = limit
    $p2 = limit
    do(
        gopast v  gopast non-v  setmark p1
        gopast v  gopast non-v  setmark p2
    )

    backwards (
        do Step_1a
        do Step_1b
        do Step_1c
        do Step_2
        do Step_3
        do Step_4
        do Step_5a
        do Step_5b
    )

    do(Y_found  repeat(goto (['Y']) <-'y'))

)
